Utah statutes.
17-37-2.   Planetarium board of directors -- Establishment -- Expenses.
(1)  Upon the establishment of a county planetarium under the provisions of
this chapter or upon the determination of the county executive to contract for
planetarium facilities and equipment and other planetarium services, the
county executive shall:
(a)  with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, appoint a
planetarium board of directors, chosen at large based upon fitness for the
office; and
(b)  determine the number of people to serve as the board of directors.
(2)  Members of the county legislative body may serve on the board of
directors, but not more than one member of the county legislative body may be
a member of the board at any one time.
(3)  Directors shall serve without compensation, but their actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties may be
paid from the county planetarium fund.
